Utah statutes.
19-6-815.   Payment by Division of Finance.

(1)  The Division of Finance is authorized to pay the recycler partial reimbursements described in Section 19-6-809 from the fund.

(2)  The Division of Finance shall pay the dollar amount of partial reimbursement approved by the local health department to the recycler within the next payment period established by rule of the Division of Finance, after receipt of the local health department's report and recommendation.

